Utah statutes.
17D-2-506.   Other entities not responsible for local building authority
bonds or breach of mortgage and other obligations.
(1)  Nothing in this part may be construed to require:
(a)  the state or any political subdivision of the state to pay a bond issued
under this part;
(b)  the state or, except the creating local entity, any political subdivision
of the state to pay any rent or lease payment due to a local building
authority under the terms of a lease agreement; or
(c)  the creating local entity to appropriate money to pay:
(i)  principal of or interest on bonds issued by a local building authority;
or
(ii)  the lease payments under a lease agreement with the local building
authority.
(2)  A breach of a mortgage or a covenant or agreement in a mortgage may not
impose a general obligation or liability upon or a charge against:
(a)  the creating local entity; or
(b)  the general credit or taxing power of the state or any political
subdivision of the state.
